Florida, session 2026, HB893.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 655.98 Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
655.98 Lawyer or law firm trust account interest rates.—A
financial institution may hold funds in an interest-bearing
trust account of a lawyer or law firm in which the institution
remits interest or dividends on the balance of the deposited
funds to an entity established by the Supreme Court. Such entity
shall use the interest or dividends to provide or facilitate the
provision of free legal services to low-income individuals or
for such other purposes as may be expressly authorized by rule
of the Supreme Court. If the financial institution holds such an
account, it must pay, net of all fees and charges assessed by
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb893 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 893 2026 Legislature
the financial institution, interest or dividends at the Wall
Street Journal prime rate in effect on the first business day of
each month, less 300 basis points, with a floor of 0.25 percent
and a ceiling of 1.5 percent.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb893 -00-er